Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.325

Legislative oral history committee—Members, staff.

(1) A legislative oral history committee is created, which shall consist of the following individuals:

(a) Four members of the house of representatives, two from each of the two largest caucuses of the house, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(b) Four members of the senate, two from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

(c) The chief clerk of the house of representatives; and

(d) The secretary of the senate.

(2) Ex officio members may be appointed by a majority vote of the committee's members appointed under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The chair of the committee shall be elected by a majority vote of the committee members appointed under subsection (1) of this section.

(4) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the office of the secretary of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

[ 2020 c 114 s 8; 2008 c 222 s 4; 1991 c 237 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.07.230.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.

Effective date—1991 c 237: See note following RCW 44.04.320.